Massachusetts, session 194th, H1386.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 6D of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking subsection (d) in its entirety and inserting in 
place thereof the following:-  
(d) The commission shall consider proposals that achieve 1 or more of the following 
goals: (i) to support safety-net provider and disproportionate share hospital participation in new 
payment and health care payment and service delivery models; (ii) to support the successful 
implementation of performance improvement plans by health care entities under subsection (c) 
of section 10; (iii) to support cooperative efforts between representatives of employees and 
management that are focused on controlling costs and improving the quality of care through 
workforce engagement; (iv) to support the evaluation of mobile health and connected health 
technologies to improve health outcomes among under-served patients with chronic diseases; (v) 
to develop the capacity to safely and effectively treat chronic, common, and complex diseases in 

of 5 13 rural and underserved areas and to monitor outcomes of those treatments; (vi) to reimburse the 
center for health information analysis on all funds expended for the purposes of executing the 
uniform medical debt reporting system established in section 25 of chapter 12C; and (vii) any 
other goals as determined by the commission.  
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 12C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the definition of ''Medical assistance program'' the following 
definition:-  
“Medical debt”, any debt owed for goods or services provided by a medical facility, a 
provider of health care or a provider of emergency medical services including the financing or an 
extension of credit by a third party for the sole purpose of purchasing goods or services provided 
by a medical facility, a provider of health care or a provider of emergency medical services.  
And is further amended by inserting after the definition of ''Self-insured group'' the 
following definition:-   
“Significant medical debt”, any medical debt owed by an individual exceeding $200.  
SECTION 3. Said chapter 12C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after section 24 the following new section:-  
Section 25. Uniform medical debt reporting system  
(a) The center shall coordinate with the public health council, the boards of registration 
for providers, the commission board, and the state finance and governance board to develop a 
uniform and interoperable electronic system of public reporting for providers as a prerequisite 
condition for advancing overdue medical bills to a debt collection agency.   

of 5 34  (b) The uniform medical debt reporting system shall include information designed to 
advise on policy relating to medical debt. The uniform medical debt reporting system shall also 
ensure a comprehensive and transparent analysis of demographic data as it relates to medical 
debt including, but not limited to, rates of medical debt carried in the following demographics: 
(1) race; (2) sex, gender identity, and sexual orientation; (2) disability status; (3) criminal record; 
(4) health status; (5) family and individual income level; (6) education; (7) nation of origin; (8) 
region of residence in the commonwealth; (8) individual and family health insurance status; (8) 
veteran status; (9) age group; (10) chronic condition status; (11) education level;  (12) primary 
language; and (13) times between procedures and reporting of debt to a collection agency.  
(c) The purpose of the uniform medical debt reporting system is to reduce the adverse 
effects of medical debt and to protect patients in matters related to medical creditors, medical 
debt buyers, and medical debt collectors with respect to such debt. As such, the center shall 
collect and analyze data on all aspects related to the purposes of this section including, but not 
limited to: trends of medical debt assignment and collection per provider; rates of medical debt 
qualifying as “significant” as defined in section 1; the relative concentration of individual and 
family debt per person as compared to the total amount of medical debt in the commonwealth; 
any risks associated with masking medical debt data; the impact of medical debt data on public 
health and welfare; and dating relating to the rate at which those carrying medical debts 
successfully settle such debt.   
(d) The center may centralize the uniform medical debt reporting system or create a 
central portal for public access to the medical debt data and information. The uniform medical 
debt reporting system shall be accessible to other state agencies and authorities including, but not 

of 5 56 limited to, the commission, the secretary for the executive office of health and human services, 
the department of public health, and the state finance and governance board.  
(e) The center shall promptly make available to the secretary of the executive office of 
health and human services all data pursuant to subsection (a) prior to a provider sending such 
debt information to a collection agency.  
(f) The center shall coordinate with the commission, through its oversight and control of 
the Healthcare Payment Reform Fund, pursuant to section 7 of chapter 6D, to receive 
reimbursement funds for the purposes of executing the uniform medical debt reporting system as 
established in this section.  
SECTION 4. Section 52 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after clause (6) of subsection (a) the following two clauses:-  
(7) Information concerning medical debt arising from the receipt of health care services.  
(8) Medical debt which has:  
(a) not yet been reported to the secretary of the executive office of health and human 
services pursuant to section 25(c) of chapter 12C;    
(b) already been fully paid or settled; or  
(c) existed for less than one year from the date of first acquisition.  
SECTION 5. Said section 52 of said chapter 93, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  

of 5 75  (b) Except for the provisions in clause (8), the provisions of subsection (a) are not 
applicable in the case of any consumer credit report to be used in connection with:  
(1) a credit transaction involving, or which may reasonably be expected to involve, a 
principal amount of fifty thousand dollars or more; or   
(2) the underwriting of life insurance involving, or which may reasonably be expected to 
involve, a face amount of fifty thousand dollars or more.